Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.340

Theft with the intent to resell.

(1) A person is guilty of theft with the intent to resell if he or she commits theft of property with a value of at least two hundred fifty dollars from a mercantile establishment with the intent to resell the property for monetary or other gain.

(2) The person is guilty of theft with the intent to resell in the first degree if the property has a value of one thousand five hundred dollars or more. Theft with the intent to resell in the first degree is a class B felony.

(3) The person is guilty of theft with the intent to resell in the second degree if the property has a value of at least two hundred fifty dollars, but less than one thousand five hundred dollars. Theft with the intent to resell in the second degree is a class C felony.

(4) For purposes of this section, a series of thefts committed by the same person from one or more mercantile establishments over a period of one hundred eighty days may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all the property shall be the value considered in determining the degree of the theft with the intent to resell involved. Thefts committed by the same person in different counties that have been aggregated in one county may be prosecuted in any county in which one of the thefts occurred.

[ 2006 c 277 s 1.]